Georgia statutes. TITLE 49 Social Services
CHAPTER 3 County and District Departments, Boards, and Directors of Family and Children Services

Cross references.

Supervision and support of paupers by counties, T. 36, C. 12.

49-3-1.
Establishment of county and district departments, boards, and directors.

There shall be in each county of the state a county department of family and children services, which shall consist of a county board of family and children services, a county director of family and children services, and such additional employees as may be necessary for the efficient performance of the welfare services of the county.

With the approval of the Department of Human Services, two or more counties may, however, unite and form a district department of family and children services, in which case a county board shall be appointed for each county composing the district as provided in Code Section 49-3-2 and those boards, acting together, shall constitute the district board. All duties and responsibilities set forth in this title for county departments shall also apply to district departments. The district director and other executive staff of any district department shall be appointed by the Department of Human Services, provided that the department shall not appoint as district director any person whose appointment is not approved by a majority of the district board concerned in a meeting of such district board called for that purpose.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, § 9; Ga. L. 1975, p. 1211, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228.

49-3-2.
Appointment of county board members; terms; vacancies; per diem and expenses; role of county board.

Each county board shall consist of between five and seven members who shall be appointed by the governing authority of the county. No person serving as a member of a county board on July 1, 2015, shall have such person’s term of office shortened by this subsection. On and after that date, however, vacancies in such office which occur for any reason, including but not limited to expiration of the term of office, shall be filled by appointment of the county governing authority except as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section. No elected officer of the state or any subdivision thereof shall be eligible for appointment to the county board. In making appointments to the county board of family and children services, the governing authority shall ensure that appointments are reflective of gender, race, ethnic, and age characteristics of the county population. Further, the governing authority shall ensure that all appointments made on or after July 1, 2015, are made from the following categories:

Pediatric health care providers, active or retired;

Appropriate school personnel, active or retired;

Emergency responders, active or retired;

Law enforcement personnel, active or retired;

Private child welfare service providers, active or retired;

Alumni of the child welfare system;

Mental health care providers, active or retired;

Former foster parents; and

Leaders within the faith-based community, active or retired.

The term of office of members of the county board shall be for five years and until the appointment and qualification of their respective successors.

Appointments to fill vacancies on the county board caused by death, resignation, or removal before the expiration of a term shall be made for the remainder of such term in the same manner as provided in this Code section for original appointments. In the event that the governing authority of the county shall fail to fill any such vacancy or any vacancy caused by expiration of term on the county board within 90 days after such vacancy occurs, the commissioner may appoint members to the county board to fill such vacancies.

Members of the county board shall serve without compensation, except that they shall be paid a per diem of not less than $15.00 per month and shall be reimbursed for traveling and other expenses actually incurred in the performance of their official duties; provided, however, that the gross expenses assessed against a county shall not exceed the amount of the budget of the county previously set aside and levied by the county authorities for such expenses.

The role of the county board shall be to protect the well-being of this state’s children while preserving family integrity. County boards may review the administration of all welfare and public assistance functions for the county, including such programs as Temporary Assistance for Needy Families (TANF), Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP), employment services, child protective services, foster care, and adoptions, and shall report no less than annually and not later than December 15 of each year to the director of the Division of Family and Children Services of the department the effectiveness of the county department’s provision of services, the needs of the community, and its recommendations for improved operations of the county department. County boards shall serve as an active liaison and a link between the county department and the local community. County boards shall support the overall mission of the Division of Family and Children Services of the department.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, § 10; Ga. L. 1963, p. 222, § 1; Ga. L. 1981, p. 960, § 1; Ga. L. 1988, p. 1354, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 505, § 1; Ga. L. 2015, p. 552, § 2/SB 138; Ga. L. 2016, p. 376, § 1/HB 765; Ga. L. 2017, p. 774, § 49/HB 323.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote this Code section.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, added “, active or retired” at the end of paragraphs (a)(1) through (a)(5), (a)(7), and (a)(9).

The 2017 amendment,

effective May 9, 2017, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, revised capitalization throughout subsection (e).

49-3-3.
Appointment of county director; bond of county director.

Each county board of family and children services shall recommend to the commissioner of human services one or more names for appointment to the position of county director. The commissioner is designated as the appointing authority for the department and may accept or reject any such recommendation.

The county director shall give bond for the faithful performance of his duties and the faithful accounting of all moneys coming into his hands as such county director, in such a manner and under such terms and conditions as may be prescribed by the Department of Human Services.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, § 11; Ga. L. 1951, p. 282, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 240, § 2; Ga. L. 2008, p. 345, § 1/HB 715; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 2-2, 2-4/HB 228.

49-3-3.1.
Annual report from county director of department of family and children services; personal appearance.

The county director of the department of family and children services of each county shall provide an annual report no later than December 31 of each year, beginning in the year 2000, to the county board, county commission, and the director of the Division of Family and Children Services. The county director of the department of family and children services of each county shall notify each member of the General Assembly whose legislative district includes any part of that county of the availability of the annual report but shall not be required to distribute copies of the annual report to the members. The report shall include the following information for the 12 month period ending June 30 of that year:

The number of children for whom the county department has received a complaint of child abuse pursuant to Code Section 19-7-5;

General demographic data such as gender, race, and age regarding children specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection;

The number of children taken into county department custody;

The number of placements of children in county department custody by the type of placement;

The length of time in county department custody by the number of children; and

Any other information required by the director of the Division of Family and Children Services.

A majority of the legislative delegation whose members are required to receive notification pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section shall be authorized to require the director of the department of family and children services of the county which provided that report to appear before that delegation and to answer questions regarding that report and other matters relating to issues of child abuse and child protective services.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-3-3.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 240, § 3; Ga. L. 2005, p. 1036, § 38/SB 49.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, “subsection” was substituted for “Code section” at the end of paragraph (a)(2).

49-3-4.
Appointment of staff; salaries; power of commissioner to transfer employees.

The county department staff necessary to administer welfare activities within the county shall be appointed pursuant to the rules and regulations of the Department of Human Services and the State Personnel Board and subject to the approval of the commissioner of human services. Staff appointments shall meet the qualifications prescribed by the department.

The salaries of the members of the staff shall be fixed by the county director in conformity with the salary schedule prescribed by the Department of Human Services.

The commissioner shall have power to transfer from one county to another or from one district to another any employee of a county department.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, §§ 12, 14; Ga. L. 1951, p. 282, § 1; Ga. L. 1963, p. 222, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 240, § 4; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 2-2, 2-4/HB 228; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-95/HB 642.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “State Personnel Board” for “State Personnel Administration” in the first sentence of subsection (a).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

49-3-5.
Powers and duties of county director.

The county director shall be the executive and administrative officer of the county department, shall be responsible for operations and personnel, and shall serve as the secretary of the county board. He shall prepare and submit to the county board for its approval an annual budget of all funds necessary for the county department. He shall prepare annually a full report of the operations and administration of the county department.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, § 12; Ga. L. 1963, p. 222, § 2; Ga. L. 1976, p. 685, § 2.

49-3-6.
Functions of county department.

The primary purpose of county departments shall be to protect children. To achieve this primary purpose, the county departments shall, in accordance with rules and regulations of the Division of Family and Children Services of the department:

Investigate reports of abuse or neglect;

Assess, promote, and support the safety of a child in a safe and stable family or other appropriate placement in response to allegations of abuse or neglect;

Work cooperatively with law enforcement regarding reports that include criminal conduct allegations;

In collaboration with the family treatment court division planning group, if one exists, establish a written protocol to assess cases involving substantiated reports of abuse or neglect for possible referral to a family treatment court division. Such protocol shall be consistent with the Council of Accountability Courts of Georgia’s certification requirements and include sufficient criteria to determine the need for substance abuse treatment; and

Without compromising child safety, coordinate services to achieve and maintain permanency on behalf of the child, strengthen the family, and provide prevention, intervention, and treatment services pursuant to this title.

In addition to the purpose in subsection (a) of this Code section, and subject to the rules and regulations of the Board of Human Services, the county department shall be charged with the administration of all forms of public assistance in the county, including home relief; indoor and outdoor care for those in need; temporary assistance for needy families; old-age assistance; aid to the blind and otherwise disabled; the care and treatment of dependent and neglected children; and such other welfare activities as shall be delegated to it by the Division of Family and Children Services of the department or by the county commissioners.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 355, § 13; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 14; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 7; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, §§ 2-2, 2-3/HB 228; Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-100/HB 310; Ga. L. 2015, p. 552, § 3/SB 138; Ga. L. 2017, p. 585, § 1-5/SB 174.

The 2015 amendments. —

The first 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, inserted “juvenile” preceding “probation officer” in the last sentence of the previously existing provisions of this Code section. The second 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, rewrote this Code section. See Code Commission note regarding the effect of these amendments.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in subsection (a), substituted “or” for “and” in paragraph (a)(1), deleted “and” at the end of paragraph (a)(3), added paragraph (a)(4), and redesignated former paragraph (a)(4) as present paragraph (a)(5).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2015, the amendment to this Code section by Ga. L. 2015, p. 422, § 5-100/HB 310, was treated as impliedly repealed and superseded by Ga. L. 2015, p. 552, § 3/SB 138, due to irreconcilable conflict.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1997, p. 1021, § 10, not codified by the General Assembly, provides for severability.

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 284 (1997).

For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 231 (2015).

For article on the 2017 amendment of this Code section, see 34 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 115 (2017).

49-3-7.
Removal of county director for falsification of qualifications.

The State Personnel Board and the Department of Administrative Services shall remove from office any county director who has falsified any statement relating to his or her education, social welfare service, or other qualification, in any particular, whether material or immaterial. The application of the county director for examination, on file with the Department of Administrative Services, shall not be allowed to be varied by other evidence offered by the county director; the application itself shall be the controlling factor in the determination of its truth or untruth.

History.

Ga. L. 1945, p. 689, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 2009, p. 745, § 2/SB 97; Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 2-96/HB 642.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, twice substituted “Department of Administrative Services” for “State Personnel Administration” in this Code section.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-1/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Personnel, equipment, and facilities that were assigned to the State Personnel Administration as of June 30, 2012, shall be transferred to the Department of Administrative Services on the effective date of this Act.” This Act became effective July 1, 2012.

Ga. L. 2012, p. 446, § 3-2/HB 642, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Appropriations for functions which are transferred by this Act may be transferred as provided in Code Section 45-12-90.”

49-3-8.
Destruction of county departmental records.

Any county department of family and children services, at the discretion of the county director, may destroy public assistance case records which have been inactive for three years or more, as well as related statistical and financial forms and reports. A record must be retained beyond the three-year period as long as a federal or state audit of that record is in progress, or if an audit’s findings have not been resolved, or if the case in question is the subject of pending administrative or judicial litigation.

History.

Ga. L. 1953, p. 17, § 1; Ga. L. 1982, p. 881, §§ 1, 3.

49-3-9.
DFCS Regional Advisory Board established in each region; membership; purpose; meetings.

There is established in each region a DFCS Regional Advisory Board. Each regional advisory board shall be composed of at least five members and shall include the director and at least one board member of each county department of family and children services within the region as selected by the DFCS regional director. The DFCS regional director may appoint additional members who are representatives from the categories included in paragraphs (1) through (9) of subsection (a) of Code Section 49-3-2. The purpose of the regional advisory boards shall be to improve communication and coordination between the county departments of family and children services of the counties within the region, to improve and streamline service delivery by the county departments, and to provide for the consistent application of state policy of the Division of Family and Children Services of the department within the county departments within each DFCS region. Each regional advisory board shall meet at least quarterly.

History.

Code 1981, §

49-3-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 552, § 4/SB 138.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective July 1, 2015.